Washington statutes.
RCW 27.20.040

State law librarian and assistants—Appointment, tenure, compensation.

The supreme court shall appoint a state law librarian, who may be removed at its pleasure. The librarian shall receive such compensation only as shall be fixed by the court.

The court may also appoint and fix the salaries of such assistants and clerical personnel as may be required.

[ 1959 c 188 s 2.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR 18.